Utah statutes.
53-3-210.6.   Motorcycle learner permit.

(1)  The division, upon receiving an application for a motorcycle learner permit, may issue a motorcycle learner permit effective for six months to an applicant who:

(a)  holds an original or provisional class D license, a CDL, or an out-of-state equivalent of an original or provisional class D license or a CDL; and

(b)  has passed the motorcycle knowledge test.

(2)  A motorcycle learner permit entitles an applicant to operate a motorcycle on a highway subject to the restrictions in Subsection (3).

(3) (a)  For the first two months from the date a motorcycle learner permit is issued, the operator of a motorcycle holding the motorcycle learner permit may not operate a motorcycle:

(i)  on a highway with a posted speed limit of more than 60 miles per hour;

(ii)  with any passengers; or

(iii)  during the nighttime hours after 10 p.m. and before 6 a.m.

(b)  For the third through sixth months from the date a motorcycle learner permit is issued, the operator of a motorcycle holding the motorcycle learner permit may operate a motorcycle without any restrictions imposed under this Subsection (3).

(c)  It is an affirmative defense to a charge that a person who has been issued a motorcycle learner permit is operating a motorcycle in violation of the restrictions under Subsection (3)(a) if the person is operating the motorcycle:

(i)  for the operator's employment, including the trip to and from the operator's residence and the operator's employment;

(ii)  on assignment of a rancher or farmer and the operator is engaged in an agricultural operation; or

(iii)  in an emergency.

(4)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division shall make rules governing the issuance of a motorcycle learner permit and establishing the proof requirements for an applicant to demonstrate that the applicant has completed a motorcycle rider education program.



Enacted by Chapter 304, 2008 General Session

